Utah statutes.
76-5-107.3.   Threat of terrorism -- Penalty.
(1)  A person commits a threat of terrorism if the person threatens to commit
any offense involving bodily injury, death, or substantial property damage,
and:
(a) (i)  threatens the use of a weapon of mass destruction, as defined in
Section 76-10-401; or
(ii)  threatens the use of a hoax weapon of mass destruction, as defined in
Section 76-10-401; or
(b)  acts with intent to:
(i)  intimidate or coerce a civilian population or to influence or affect the
conduct of a government or a unit of government;
(ii)  prevent or interrupt the occupation of a building or a portion of the
building, a place to which the public has access, or a facility or vehicle of
public transportation operated by a common carrier; or
(iii)  cause action of any nature by an official or volunteer agency organized
to deal with emergencies.
(2) (a)  A violation of Subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b)(i) is a second degree
felony.
(b)  A violation of Subsection (1)(b)(ii) is a third degree felony.
(3)  It is not a defense under this section that the person did not attempt to
carry out or was incapable of carrying out the threat.
(4)  A threat under this section may be express or implied.
(5)  A person who commits an offense under this section is subject to
punishment for that offense, in addition to any other offense committed,
including the carrying out of the threatened act.
(6)  In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, a court shall order
any person convicted of any violation of this section to reimburse any
federal, state, or local unit of government, or any private business,
organization, individual, or entity for all expenses and losses incurred in
responding to the violation, unless the court states on the record the reasons
why the reimbursement would be inappropriate.
